Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
385

ADDITIONAL
UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION

BENEFITS
LAW

Section

385-1 Additional unemployment compensation
benefits;

payable when

385-2 Definitions, generally

385-3 Payment of benefits

385-4 Weekly benefit amount

385-5 Maximum benefits payable

385-6 Requirements for eligibility

385-7 Disqualification for additional
unemployment benefits

385-8 Claim

385-9 Effective date of claim; waiting period
not required

385-10 Determination, redetermination, notice of

determination, appeal

385-11 Recovery of additional unemployment
benefits;

penalties

385-12 Additional unemployment compensation fund

385-13 Administration; other sections applicable

385-14 Rights, etc., preserved; other sections
applicable

385-15 Nonliability of State

385-16 Period of benefit payments; issuance of
further

proclamations

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next